Utah statutes.
63J-8-105.   Maps available for public review.

A printed copy of the maps referenced in Subsections 63J-8-102 (5), (9), (21), and (22) shall be available for inspection by the public at the offices of the Utah Association of Counties.



Amended by Chapter 393, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 472, 2013 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Amended by Chapter 472, 2013 General Session

